California statutes. Education Code
(c) All other applicable procedures were followed by the California State University, the community college district, or the University of California in expending the funds. The advance of funds by the California State University, a community college district, or the University of California, for preliminary plans and working drawings, shall be made to promote early completion of a capital outlay project authorized by the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

67501.

(a) The University of California may, and the California State University shall, submit to the Legislature on or before November 30 of each year a comprehensive five-year capital outlay plan that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(1) State and nonstate projects proposed for each campus in each year of the plan, including a discussion of the programmatic bases for each project.

(2) An explanation of how each project contributes to accommodating needs associated with current or projected enrollments of graduate and undergraduate students, and other needs, and the rough estimates of the costs of meeting those needs.

(3) The estimated costs of each project, showing the schedule for when these funds will be needed, including a schedule of annual funding needs beyond the five years for those projects for which completion exceeds the timeframe of the plan and the relative priority on a campus and statewide basis.

(4) An explanation of how the plan addresses the Legislature’s intent that the universities annually consider, as part of their annual capital outlay planning process, the inclusion of facilities that may be used by more than one segment of public higher education (intersegmental).

(5) Description and costs of activities that take place within the plan’s timeframe related to the planning or establishment of new campuses.

(b) The California Community Colleges
 Chancellor’s office shall prepare a five-year capital outlay plan identifying the statewide needs and priorities of the California Community Colleges. This plan shall be submitted to the Legislature on or before November 30 of each year. It is the intent of the Legislature not to consider any community college capital outlay project that is not included in the statewide five-year plan submitted to the Legislature. The five-year capital outlay plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Enrollment projections for each community college district.

(2) Projects proposed for each campus in each year of the plan.

(3) The estimated costs of each project, showing the schedule for when these funds will be needed and the relative priority on a statewide basis.

(4) An explanation of the Chancellor’s office priorities and methodology for selecting projects for state capital outlay funding.

(5) An explanation of the Chancellor’s office methodology for calculating unmet capital outlay needs for the community college system.

(6) An explanation of how the plan addresses the Legislature’s intent that the community colleges annually consider, as part of their annual capital outlay planning process, the inclusion of facilities that may be used by more than one segment of public higher education (intersegmental).

(c) The plans for the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges shall be updated annually, taking into consideration evolving circumstances in the planning process of the institutions. The Legislature recognizes that the annual plan is a
 flexible, working document subject to the evolutionary change inherent in the planning process. The plan shall be designed to reflect project data changes on a year-to-year basis, and the inclusion of a project in the plan does not guarantee its viability. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the project planning guides or capital outlay budget change proposals submitted for each state-funded project proposed for inclusion in the first year of the plan specify both of the following:

(1) How each project meets needs
 for different types of space, including, but not limited to, classrooms, teaching laboratories, research laboratories, and faculty offices.

(2) The direct and indirect project costs associated with the different types of space.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 10.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

67502.

(a) On or before November 1 of each year, the Regents of the University of California are requested to provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance a summary of all instructional and research space in the university system. The summary shall consist of campus-by-campus data indicating existing space available to each department of instruction and research, including a seven-year projection of space needs for departments of instruction and research. The data shall include, but not be limited to, classrooms, upper and lower division class laboratories, teaching assistant offices, and faculty offices. The summary shall correlate assignable square foot capacities to full-time equivalent student enrollments and faculty positions for both existing space and projected space needs.
 

(b) On or before November 1 of each year, the California State University shall provide to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and the Department of Finance a summary of all instructional and faculty office space in the university system. The summary shall consist of campus-by-campus data indicating existing instructional space available including a seven-year projection of space needs for instruction and faculty offices. The data shall include, but not be limited to, classrooms, upper and lower division class laboratories, teaching assistant offices, and faculty offices. The summary shall correlate assignable square foot capacities to full-time equivalent student enrollments and faculty positions for both existing space and projected space needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 11.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

67503.

(a) On or before November 1, 2010, and at least biennially thereafter, the University of California is requested to, and the California State University shall, report on the utilization of classrooms and teaching laboratories. The report shall include for each campus in their respective system the total number of rooms, number of stations, weekly student contact hours, and weekly station hours. The report shall also include the average weekly hours of station use and actual utilization as a percentage of the utilization standard. 

(b) On or before November 1, 2010, and at least biennially thereafter, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall report on the utilization of classrooms and teaching laboratories. The
 report shall include, for each college, the total number of rooms, number of stations, weekly student contact hours, average weekly student contact hours per station, and actual utilization as a percentage of the utilization standard.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 12.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

67504.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that based on academic goals and projected enrollment levels, each University of California campus and medical center periodically develops a Long Range Development Plan (LRDP) that guides its physical development, including land use designations, the location of buildings, and infrastructure systems, for an established time horizon.

(2) In order to ensure greater legislative oversight over the process used by the University of California to prepare and implement each plan, including the accompanying Environmental Impact Report (EIR), at the time draft LRDPs and draft LRDP EIRs are submitted for public review, the university is requested to provide the Legislature with summaries of
 the draft LRDPs and LRDP EIRs to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The summaries shall also be available on the university Internet Web site.

(b) (1) The Legislature further finds and declares that the expansion of campus enrollment and facilities may negatively affect the surrounding environment. Consistent with the requirements of the California Environmental Quality Act (CEQA), it is the intent of the Legislature that the University of California sufficiently mitigate significant off-campus impacts related to campus growth and development.

(2) On or before March 1 of each year from 2010 to 2012, inclusive, the University of California is requested to report
 for each campus on the status of implementation, including the implementation dates where applicable, of mitigation measures for significant off-campus impacts identified consistent with the requirements of CEQA, including those that require fair share payments to local agencies. The report shall identify the status of fair share mitigation agreements with and payments to local agencies for mitigation of off-campus impacts that are required in certified EIRs. The report should also list any monetary or equivalent in-kind payments to local agencies made by the campuses for the mitigation of off-campus impacts that do not involve fair share language in CEQA documents and that have been implemented under other arrangements. For those significant off-campus impacts that have been triggered but have not been sufficiently mitigated, the university shall report on the additional steps that are being taken to reach a resolution.

(c) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that each California State University campus periodically develops a physical master plan to guide the future development of their facilities, based on academic goals and projected student enrollment levels, for an established time horizon.

(2) In order to ensure greater legislative oversight over the process used by the California State University to prepare and implement each plan, including the accompanying Environmental Impact Report (EIR), at the time a draft physical master plan and the accompanying draft EIR are submitted for public review, the university shall provide summaries of these documents to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The summaries shall also be available on the university Internet Web site.

(d) (1) The Legislature further finds and declares that the expansion of campus
 enrollment and facilities may negatively affect the surrounding environment. In view of the case City of Marina v. the Board of Trustees of the California State University (2006) 639 Cal.4th 341, it is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University take steps to reach agreements with local public agencies regarding the mitigation of off-campus impacts related to campus growth and development.

(2) On or before March 1 of each year from 2010 to 2012, inclusive, the California State University shall report by campus on the status of any negotiations with local agencies for mitigation measures for significant off-campus impacts identified consistent with the requirements of CEQA, including implementation dates where applicable. For
 each impact, this report shall identify whether an agreement has been reached with local agencies. The report shall also list any monetary and nonmonetary in-kind payments made by the campus for the mitigation of off-campus impacts identified as unavoidable in the certified EIRs. For those impacts for which there is no agreement, the university shall explain what steps were taken and if any additional steps will be taken to reach an agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 386, Sec. 13.   (AB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 40.7. ARMED FORCES TRAINING AND RECRUITMENT [67600. - 67600.]

67600.

Nothing in the public policy of the State of California requires the establishment or the disestablishment of any United States Armed Forces training unit or class at any campus of a public postsecondary educational institution or the prohibition of employment recruitment by the United States Armed Forces at any campus of a public postsecondary educational institution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 41. UNIFORM STUDENT RESIDENCY REQUIREMENTS [68000. - 68134.]



  CHAPTER 1. Student Residency Requirements [68000. - 68134.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [68000. - 68000.]

68000.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the public institutions of higher education shall apply uniform rules, as set forth in this chapter and not otherwise, in determining whether a student shall be classified as resident or a nonresident.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [68011. - 68023.]

68011.

“Institution” means the University of California, the California State University, or a college of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

68012.

(a) “District” means a community college district maintaining one or more community colleges.

(b) “District governing board” means the governing board of a district maintaining one or more community colleges.

(c) “Governing board” means the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Governors of the California Maritime Academy, or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 227.)
-------------------------------------------

68014.

“Parent” means the parent with whom the minor resides; or, if both parents are deceased, his or her legal guardian.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

68015.

“Student” means a person enrolled in or applying for admission to an institution.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68016.

“Continuous attendance,” as it refers to attendance at an institution, means a student claiming continuous attendance who has been enrolled full time, as determined by the governing board or district governing board, as appropriate, for a normal academic year at the institution since the beginning of the period for which continuous attendance is claimed. Nothing in this section shall require a student to attend summer sessions or other terms beyond the normal academic year in order to render his or her attendance “continuous.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 229.)
-------------------------------------------

68017.

A “resident” is a student who has residence, pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 68060) of this chapter in the state for more than one year immediately preceding the residence determination date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68018.

A “nonresident” is a student who does not have residence in the state for more than one year immediately preceding the residence determination date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68022.

“Resident classification” means classification as a resident, pursuant to Section 68017, at the University of California, the California State University, the California Maritime Academy, or a California community college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 233.)
-------------------------------------------

68023.

“Residence determination date” is a date or day established by the governing boards or district governing boards, as appropriate, for each semester, quarter, or term to determine a student’s residence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 234.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Classification [68040. - 68044.]

68040.

Each student shall be classified as a resident or nonresident at the University of California, the California State University, or the California Maritime Academy or at a California community college.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

68041.

Each student enrolled or applying for admission to an institution shall provide the information and evidence of residence as deemed necessary by the governing board or district governing board, as appropriate, to determine his or her classification. An oath or affirmation may be required in connection with taking testimony necessary to ascertain a student’s classification. The determination of a student’s classification shall be made in accordance with this part and the residence determination date for the semester, quarter, or term for which the student proposes to attend an institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

68042.

The governing board or district governing board may appoint persons to administer oaths or affirmations in connection with taking testimony necessary to ascertain a student’s classification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68043.

A student classified as a nonresident shall not obtain resident classification as a result of maintaining continuous attendance at an institution without meeting the other requirements of this part for obtaining such classification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68044.

The governing boards shall adopt rules and regulations for determining a student’s classification and for establishing procedures for review and appeal of that classification. The adopted rules and regulations shall include provisions requiring that the financial independence of a student classified as a nonresident seeking reclassification as a resident shall be included among the factors to be considered in the determination of residency.

The adopted rules and regulations shall, beginning the 1983–84 school year, exempt nonresident students who have been appointed to serve as graduate student teaching assistants, graduate student research assistants, or graduate student teaching associates on any campus of the University of California or the California State University, and who have been employed on a 0.49 or more time basis, from the requirement of demonstrating his or her financial independence under this section for purposes of reclassification as a resident.

A student shall be considered financially independent for purposes of this section if the applicant meets all of the following requirements: (a) has not and will not be claimed as an exemption for state and federal tax purposes by his or her parent in the calendar year the reclassification application is made and in any of the three calendar years prior to the reclassification application, (b) has not and will not receive more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) per year in financial assistance from his or her parent in the calendar year the reclassification application is made and in any of the three calendar years prior to the reclassification application, and (c) has not lived and will not live for more than six weeks in the home of his or her parent during the calendar year the reclassification application is made and in any of the three calendar years prior to the reclassification application.

Other factors which may be considered in determining California residency shall be defined by the governing boards. In addition, the adopted rules and regulations shall include, but are not limited to, the evidence necessary to determine residence, procedures for obtaining residence information and procedures for administering oaths in connection with taking of testimony relative to residence. A district governing board may adopt rules and regulations which are not inconsistent with those adopted by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1070, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Nonresident Tuition [68050. - 68052.1.]

68050.

A student classified as a nonresident shall be required, except as otherwise provided in this part, to pay, in addition to other fees required by the institution, nonresident tuition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68051.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the governing board or district governing board shall adopt rules and regulations relating to the method of calculation of the amount of nonresident tuition, the method of payment, and the method and amount of refund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 238.)
-------------------------------------------

68052.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that California’s public institutions of higher education shall establish nonresident student tuition policies that are consistent with their resident student fee policies. Nonresident student tuition shall be determined by each of the public postsecondary segments through the adoption of a methodology that annually establishes the nonresident student tuition rate. It is further the intent of the Legislature that, while the public institutions are to be provided flexibility in establishing their nonresident tuition, under no circumstances shall the level of nonresident tuition plus required fees fall below the marginal cost of instruction for that segment.

(b) The following state
 policies regarding nonresident student tuition are hereby established:

(1) Unless otherwise prescribed by statute, an admission fee and rate of tuition fixed by each public postsecondary governing board shall be required of each nonresident student. Each public postsecondary education governing body shall develop its own methodology for establishing the nonresident tuition level and its annual adjustment level of nonresident student tuition, unless otherwise prescribed by statute.

(2) As California’s public postsecondary education segments annually adjust the level of nonresident tuition they charge out-of-state students, the nonresident tuition methodologies they develop and use should take into consideration, at minimum, the following two factors:

(A) For the University of California and the California State
 University, the total nonresident charges imposed by each of their public comparison institutions, as identified by the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

(B) The full average cost of instruction of their segment.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that under no circumstances shall an institution’s level of nonresident tuition plus required student fees fall below the marginal cost of instruction for that segment.

(4) The University of California, the California State University, the college named in Section 92200, and the California Maritime Academy should endeavor to ensure that increases in the level of nonresident tuition are gradual, moderate, and predictable by providing nonresident students with a minimum of a 10-month notice of tuition increases.

(c) No provision of this section shall be applicable to the California Community Colleges.

(d) In the event that state revenues and expenditures are substantially imbalanced due to factors unforeseen by the Governor and the Legislature, including, but not limited to, initiative measures, natural disasters, or sudden deviations from expected economic trends, the nonresident student tuition at the University of California, the California State University, the college named in Section 92200, and the California Maritime Academy, shall not be subject to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 14.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

68052.1.

The University of California is requested to comply with both of the following:

(a) By July 1, 2018, the University of California, in collaboration with the Academic Senate of the University of California,
 is requested to ensure that implementation of any admissions policy it adopts regarding admission of nonresident undergraduate students shall include guidance that ensures that the academic qualifications for admitted nonresident undergraduate students generally exceeds, on average, the academic qualifications of resident undergraduate students admitted at each campus.

(b) The University of California is requested to
 report to the Legislature annually regarding implementation of this policy, including, but not limited to, the mean and median scores on academic indicators of admitted resident and nonresident undergraduate students at each campus.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 803, Sec. 1.   (AB 1674)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Determination of Student Residence [68060. - 68062.]

68060.

Every person has, in law, a residence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68061.

Every person who is married or 18 years of age, or older, and under no legal disability to do so, may establish residence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

68062.

In determining the place of residence the following rules are to be observed:

(a) There can only be one residence.

(b) A residence is the place where a person remains when not called elsewhere for labor or other special or temporary purpose, and to which the person returns in seasons of repose.

(c) A residence cannot be lost until another is gained.

(d) The residence can be changed only by the union of act and intent.

(e) A man
 or woman may establish a residence. A woman’s residence shall not be derivative from that of the woman’s husband.

(f) The residence of the parent with whom an unmarried minor child maintains the child’s place of abode is the residence of the unmarried minor child. When the minor lives with neither parent, the minor’s residence is that of the parent with whom the minor maintained the minor’s last place of abode, provided the minor may establish a residence when both parents are deceased and a
 legal guardian has not been appointed.

(g) The residence of an unmarried minor who has a parent living cannot be changed by the minor’s own act, by the appointment of a legal guardian, or by relinquishment of a parent’s right of control.

(h) A person who is not a citizen or national of the United States, including one who is an unmarried minor, may establish a residence, unless precluded by the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 1101, et seq.) from establishing domicile in the United States.

(i) The residence of an unmarried minor who is not a citizen or national of the United States shall be derived from the minor’s parents pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions (f) and
 (g).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 680, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 21.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Superseded by amendment by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, only if it becomes operative on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

68062.

In determining the place of residence the following rules are to be observed:

(a) There can only be one residence.

(b) A residence is the place where one remains when not called elsewhere for labor or other special or temporary purpose, and to which he or she returns in seasons of repose.

(c) A residence cannot be lost until another is gained.

(d) The residence can be changed only by the union of act and intent.

(e) A man or
 woman may establish his or her residence. A woman’s residence shall not be derivative from that of her husband.

(f) The residence of the parent with whom an unmarried minor child maintains his or her place of abode is the residence of the unmarried minor child. When the minor lives with neither parent his or her residence is that of the parent with whom he or she maintained his or her last place of abode, provided the minor may establish his or her residence when both parents are deceased and a legal guardian has not been appointed.

(g) The residence of an unmarried minor who has a parent living cannot be changed by his or her own act, by the appointment of a legal guardian, or by relinquishment of a parent’s right of control.

(h) A foreign national, including an unmarried minor foreign national, may establish his or her residence, unless precluded by the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1101 et seq.) from establishing domicile in the United States.

(i) The residence of an unmarried minor foreign national shall be derived from his or her parents pursuant to the provisions of subdivisions (f) and (g).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, Sec. 7.   (AB 1850)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative only if the condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 69 is satisfied on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Exceptions to Residence Determination [68070. - 68086.]

68070.

A student who remains in this state after his or her parent, who was theretofore domiciled in California for at least one year immediately prior to leaving and has, during the student’s minority and within one year immediately prior to the residency determination date, established residence elsewhere, shall be entitled to resident classification until he or she has attained the age of majority and has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident, so long as, once enrolled, he or she maintains continuous attendance at an institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 238.2.)
-------------------------------------------

68071.

A student who has been entirely self-supporting and actually present in California for more than one year immediately preceding the residence determination date, with the intention of acquiring a residence therein, shall be entitled to resident classification until he or she has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 238.4.)
-------------------------------------------

68072.

A student who has not been an adult for more than one year immediately preceding the residence determination date for the semester, quarter, or term for which he or she proposes to attend an institution shall have his or her immediate premajority derived California residence, if any, added to his or her postmajority residence to obtain the one year of California residence required by Section 68017.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 238.6.)
-------------------------------------------

68073.

A student shall be entitled to resident classification if, immediately prior to enrolling at an institution, he or she has lived with and been under the continuous direct care and control of any adult or adults, other than a parent, for a period of not less than two years, provided that the adult or adults having control have been domiciled in California during the year immediately prior to the residence determination date. This exception shall continue until the student has attained the age of majority and has resided in the state the minimum time necessary to become a resident, so long as continuous attendance is maintained at an institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 238.8.)
-------------------------------------------

68074.

(a) A student who is a natural or adopted child, stepchild, or spouse who is a dependent of a member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed in this state on active duty is entitled to resident classification only for the purpose of determining the amount of tuition and fees.

(b) If that member of the Armed Forces of the United States, whose dependent natural or adopted child, stepchild, or spouse is in attendance at, or has been admitted to, a public postsecondary institution, (1) is thereafter transferred on military orders to a place outside this state where
 the member continues to serve in the Armed Forces of the United States, or (2) is thereafter retired as an active member of the Armed Forces of the United States, the student dependent shall not lose his or her resident classification so long as he or she remains continuously enrolled at that institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 165, Sec. 1.   (AB 172)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

68075.

(a) For purposes of this section, “Armed Forces of the United States” means the Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, and the reserve components of each of those forces, the California National Guard, the California State Guard, and the California Naval Militia.

(b) A student who is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed in this state is entitled to resident classification only for the purpose of determining the amount of tuition and fees.

(c) If that member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is in attendance at an institution is thereafter transferred on military
 orders to a place outside this state where the member continues to serve in the Armed Forces of the United States, the member shall not lose the member’s resident classification so long as the member remains continuously enrolled at that institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 440, Sec. 2.   (AB 3290)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

68075.5.

(a) Except as provided for in subdivisions (b), (c), and (d), a student of the California Community Colleges or the California State University who was a member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed in this state on active duty for more than one year immediately prior to being discharged shall be exempt from paying nonresident tuition for the length of time he or she lives in this state after being discharged up to the minimum time necessary to become a resident.

(b) (1) Except as provided for in subdivisions (c) and (d), a student enrolled, or intending to enroll, at a campus of the California Community Colleges, or as an undergraduate at a campus of
 the California State University, who was a member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed in this state on active duty for more than one year immediately prior to being discharged shall be exempt from paying nonresident tuition for up to one year if he or she files an affidavit with the institution at which he or she is enrolled, or intends to enroll, stating that he or she intends to establish residency in California as soon as possible.

(2) The one-year exemption provided in paragraph (1) shall be used by the student within two years of being discharged.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the California
 Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, update and adopt policies no later than July 1, 2015, regarding tuition rates for eligible veterans and their eligible dependents to ensure conformity to, and compliance with, the federal Veterans Access, Choice, and Accountability Act of 2014 (Public Law 113-146) and the requirements of this section.

(d) A former member of the Armed Forces of the United States who received a dishonorable or bad conduct discharge shall not be eligible for an exemption pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   (AB 13)   Effective September 27, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

68075.6.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The wars in Afghanistan, Iraq, Syria, and other countries have displaced many families, causing many of them to flee their homes in search of a better life. Between 2011 and March 2017, more than 36,000 refugees entered California, with nearly 8,000 of them entering in 2016.

(2) Under the National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2006, certain Afghan and Iraqi nationals were provided special immigrant status in the United States. Through the end of 2015, more than 37,000 individuals were granted special immigrant visa (SIV) status under this program. Between 2011 and March 2017, 9,200 SIV holders resettled in California.

(3) Under the federal Afghan Allies Protection Act of 2009, certain Afghan nationals were provided special immigrant status in the United States.

(4) Many of these families have escaped war and persecution in order to improve the lives of their families, but encounter numerous barriers, such as the cost of higher education, when assimilating into the United States. Access to institutions of higher education will ensure that students from these families are able to pursue their educational goals and rebuild and improve their lives and the lives of their families.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law:

(1) A student of the California Community Colleges who has a special immigrant visa that has been granted a status under Section 1244 of Public Law 110-181, under
 Public Law 109-163, or under Section 602(b) of Title VI of Division F of Public Law 111-8, or is a refugee admitted to the United States under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code, and who, upon entering the United States, settled in California, shall be exempt from paying the nonresident tuition fee required by Section 76140 for the length of time he or she lives in this state up to the minimum time necessary to become a resident.

(2) A community college district may report a student, who is exempt from nonresident tuition pursuant to this section and who is enrolled as a student in that district, as a full-time equivalent student for apportionment purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 33, Sec. 10.   (AB 1809)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

68075.65.

Each community college shall post on its Internet Web site a notice that sets forth which persons are exempt from paying nonresident tuition pursuant to Section 68075.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 582, Sec. 1.   (AB 2210)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

68075.7.

Notwithstanding any other law:

(a) Effective for academic terms beginning on or after August 1, 2021, a student enrolled at a campus of the California Community Colleges or the California State University who meets all of the following requirements shall be exempt from paying nonresident tuition or any other fee that is exclusively applicable to nonresident students:

(1) The student resides in California.

(2) The student meets the definition of “covered individual,” as that term is defined in Section 3679(c)(2) of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(3) The student is eligible for education
 benefits under the federal Montgomery GI Bill–Active Duty program (Chapter 30 (commencing with Section 3001) of Title 38 of the United States Code), the Veterans Readiness and Employment program (Chapter 31 (commencing with Section 3100) of Title 38 of the United States Code), the Post-9/11 GI Bill program (Chapter 33 (commencing with Section 3301) of Title 38 of the United States Code), or the Survivors’ and Dependents’ Educational Assistance program (Chapter 35 (commencing with Section 3500) of Title 38 of the United States Code), as each read on January 5, 2022.
